Hawaii, session 2026, HB1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $65,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the twenty-fifth representative district, as follows: 1.   Mother Waldron Park Improvements Plans, design, and construction for pickleball courts, lighting, and related improvements to activate this historic and integral park. Plans                          $500,000 Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority. 2.   Ilaniwai Street Improvements Design and construction for  drainage, sidewalks, and other related key infrastructure improvements; serving as a demo for the "Complete Streets" principle wherein streets becomes safer and convenient for all users, regardless of their age, ability, or mode of transportation. Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $19,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority. 3.   Kakaako Affordable Housing Land for strengthening, expanding, and cataylzing new affordable housing development in the district. Land                        $43,000,000 Total funding                    $43,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________